Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 72
SOIL EROSION - DUST BLOWING - 1954 ACT

Section

35-72-101. Legislative declaration.

Soil erosion and damage caused by wind storms and blowing soil produced thereby are recognized and declared to be injurious or destructive to the property and natural resources of this state and a menace to the safety of the citizens of the state.

To deter actions which are harmful to property and natural resources and to further the ability of persons injured by negligent conduct associated with blowing soil to have legal recourse, it is determined to be in the interest of the people of this state to allow recovery of damages for such negligent conduct.

Source:

L. 54, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 22, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1375, § 1, effective May 12.

35-72-101.5. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means a board of county commissioners.

"District" means a conservation district formed under the provisions of article 70 of this title.

"Occupier" means any person, firm, any unit of state government or any agency of the state or federal government, or corporation, other than the owner, who is in lawful possession of any land within the county, whether as lessee, renter, tenant, or otherwise.

"Owner" means any person, firm, or agency of state or federal government or unit of state government in whom is vested the ownership, dominion, or title of the property, and is recognized and held responsible by the law as owner of the property.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1375, § 2, effective May 12.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 524, § 30, effective July 1.

35-72-102. Duty of landowner - liability for damage.

To conserve property and the natural resources of the state and to prevent the injurious effects of blowing soil, it is the duty of the owner or occupier of any land in this state to prevent soil blowing therefrom, as nearly as can be done, by planting perennial grasses, shrubs, or trees or annual or biennial crops and by treatment consisting of listing, chiseling, and similar practices at such times and in such manner as will prevent or minimize erosion of the soil and soil blowing. If soil blowing is evident, such practices shall include, to the extent practicable, leaving stubble residue on top of the soil.

Any owner or occupier who sustains damages to his property, including but not limited to crops, grasslands, fences, fencerows, irrigation canals, ditches, or livestock, proximately caused by the failure of any other owner or occupier of other land to discharge his duty to prevent soil blowing from land he owns or occupies may recover actual damages from the other owner or occupier by bringing an action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Any unit of state government or any agency of the state or federal government which sustains damages to any of its property, including but not limited to roads, barrow ditches, or fences, proximately caused by the failure of an owner or occupier to discharge his duty to prevent soil blowing from land he owns or occupies may recover actual damages from such owner or occupier by bringing an action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Such recourse to the court may be taken only upon demonstration that such owner, occupier, unit, or agency of government allegedly sustaining damages has submitted a written report of soil blowing to the board pursuant to section 35-72-103.

In any action brought under this section, any preventive practice followed by an owner or occupier pursuant to a citation issued by a board pursuant to the provisions of section 35-72-103 is not an admission of tort liability, in any such action, and no determination of the board shall give rise to a presumption of negligence or lack of negligence of an owner or occupier.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any land less than one acre in area.

Source:

L. 54, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 22, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-2.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1695, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1376, § 3, effective May 12.

35-72-103. Action by county commissioners - emergency conditions.

When the board of a county of the state is advised in writing or otherwise informed that soil is blowing from land in the county; the board is supplied with a description of the land; and it appears that private property, including crops, grasslands, fences, fencerows, irrigation canals, ditches, or livestock on adjacent or other land, or roads, barrow ditches, fences or other public property is being damaged by the blowing soil, the board shall as soon as practicable:

Give notice of the complaint to the owner or occupier of the land from which soil is blowing; and

Inspect or order the inspection of the land.

If the board finds, after consultation with the local district board of directors, the state conservation board, or an extension agent with expertise in soil conservation or soil science, and after consultation with local owners or occupiers, including the owner or occupier of the land from which soil is blowing, that soil is blowing from the land in sufficient quantity to be injurious to private property, including crops, grasslands, fences, fencerows, irrigation canals, ditches, or livestock on adjacent or other land, or to roads, barrow ditches, fences, or other public property because of soil being blown thereon, the board shall determine what, if anything, can be done to prevent or materially lessen the blowing of soil from the land. If the board determines, after the consultation, that the complaint lodged with it falls under article 3.5 of this title, the board shall not take further action. If the board finds, after the consultation, that an emergency exists, that the blowing is occurring, that property damage appears to be resulting from the blowing soil, and that it can be prevented or materially lessened by treatment of the soil, the board shall issue a citation to the owner as listed upon the records of the county assessor and to the occupier, if known to the board, specifying the nature of the treatment required and the extent thereof, the date by which the treatment is to be commenced, and the date it is to be completed.

Notice of such citation shall be given by personal communication, if possible, and by mailing a copy thereof by registered mail addressed to each of the persons to whom the citation is directed at the address as shown on the records of the county assessor; otherwise, service of such citation shall be made as provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure for the service of summons. Such citation shall also be posted in a public place in the county courthouse in the county in which said land is located. If such treatment is not commenced on or before three days or within such greater time as may be specified in such citation after the date of such personal communication, mailing, and posting or the service of notice as provided in this subsection (2), or if the treatment is not performed in the manner and to the extent specified in the citation and in a workmanlike manner and with due diligence, or if, prior to the expiration of the date fixed in said citation, the persons to whom said citation is directed advise the board that they do not intend to or cannot accomplish the work so directed, the board may cause such treatment to be performed in accordance with such citation.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any land less than one acre in area.

Source:

L. 54, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 22, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-3.

L. 65:

p. 1060, § 1.

L. 81:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1695, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1377, § 4, effective May 12.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 516, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-052), ch. 43, p. 214, § 1, effective August 6.

35-72-104. Action by department of agriculture. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 54:

2nd Ex. Sess., p. 23, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-4.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1697, § 6, effective July 1.

35-72-105. Method of assessment.

Upon the completion of the treatment caused to be performed by the board as provided in section 35-72-103, the board shall, by resolution, determine what land benefits and from which soil is blowing and assess against the owner of the benefited land the actual cost of the treatment not in excess of forty dollars per acre or the actual cost of treatment, whichever is less, in one calendar year. The board shall record the resolution in the minutes of the board, deliver the original to the county assessor, and send a copy by registered mail to the landowner at the address shown on the records of the county assessor and to the occupier, if known to the board.

Upon delivery of said resolution to the assessor, he shall extend the same upon the assessment rolls, and said assessment shall thereupon become a part of the general taxes and constitute a lien against said land as set forth in said resolution and shall thereafter become due in the same manner and be collected in the same manner as the general ad valorem property tax. Such assessment may be paid at any time before general taxes become due and payable. All of the provisions of the general laws for the enforcement of the collection of taxes shall be applicable thereto after the extension by the assessor.

All such amounts collected shall be transmitted to the county treasurer, who shall credit the same to the county general fund in order to reimburse those funds which were expended by the board of county commissioners in carrying out the treatment action as authorized by this article. The county treasurer shall not be entitled to collect any fees for the collection of such assessments.

Source:

L. 54, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 23, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-5.

L. 81:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1696, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended and (5) added, p. 1378, § 5, effective May 12.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-052), ch. 43, p. 215, § 2, effective August 6.

Cross references:

For collection of taxes, see article 10 of title 39.

35-72-105.5. Immunity.

So long as it is engaged in the scope of activity permitted by the provisions of this article, a board or any of its members shall not be held liable in any court of competent jurisdiction for conduct associated with such tasks undertaken or assigned by it.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1378, § 6, effective July 1.

35-72-106. Judicial review.

Any landowner aggrieved at the amount of the assessment against his land may bring an action in the district court of the county in which the land is situated to test the validity of the assessment or to enjoin its collection, but such action must be brought within thirty days after the assessment is made and the copy of the resolution of the board is mailed as provided in section 35-72-105 and cannot be brought thereafter.

Source:

L. 54, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 24, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-6.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1378, § 7, effective May 12.

35-72-107. Cooperation with other agencies in erosion control.

The board of any county wherein land is being eroded or soil is blowing, as provided in this article, is hereby authorized to enter into any agreement with the federal government or any agency thereof, the state of Colorado or any agency thereof, any district, or any other county or counties for cooperation in preventing or attempting to prevent soil erosion or property damage by soil blowing.

Source:

L. 54, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 24, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-7.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1696, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1379, § 8, effective May 12.

35-72-108. Wind erosion control fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 54, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 25, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 128-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-3-8.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1697, § 6, effective July 1.